District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Streatery Program Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Department of Transportation Establishment Act of 2002, effective May 21,
2002 (D.C. Law 14-137; D.C. Official Code § 50-921.01 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 9v to read as follows:
“Sec. 9v. Streatery program.
“(a)(1) The annual public space rental fee for a streatery permit shall be assessed at no
more than $15 per square foot.
“(2) District agencies shall begin enforcement activities relating to noncompliance
with the Streatery Guidelines or applicable rules no sooner than January 15, 2026.
“(b)(1) It is the policy of the District to promote streateries, as streateries are a beneficial
use of public space that create a more vibrant dining scene and support local businesses.
“(2) In furtherance of the policy described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Public Space Committee may waive the following program requirements; provided, that the
waiver would not create an undue risk to pedestrians or other roadway users:
“(A) The minimum required distance between streateries and curb cuts,
driveways, alleys, and trees;
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) The prohibition on streatery enclosures or vertical support structures
that exceed 42 inches in height; and
“(C) The maximum seating capacity of a streatery.
“(3) A streatery permit holder that receives an exception under paragraph (2) of
this subsection shall apply for a streatery permit renewal through the Public Space Committee
every 2 years.”.
Sec. 3. Section 202 of the Bicycle and Pedestrian Safety Amendment Act of 2016,
effective March 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-312; D.C. Official Code § 50-2372), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (b) is amended by adding a new paragraph (4) to read as follows:
“(4) One of the roadways selected pursuant to this subsection shall include the
2000-2400 blocks of 18th Street, NW, in Ward 1.”.
(b) Subsection (c) is amended by adding a new paragraph (7A) to read as follows:
“(7A) Recommendations on the designation and design of curbside space for use
as streateries, parklets, or other public space activations;”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3